Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 2. Single and Multiple Party Accounts.

Sec. 13.33.201.
Definitions.

In AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

,

“account” means a contract of deposit between a depositor and a financial institution and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, and share account;

“agent” means a person authorized to make account transactions for a party;

“beneficiary” means a person named as one to whom sums on deposit in an account are payable on request after death of all parties or for whom a party is named as trustee;

“financial institution” means an organization authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions, and includes a bank, trust company, savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan company or association, and credit union;

“multiple-party account” means an account payable on request to one or more of two or more parties whether or not a right of survivorship is mentioned;

“party” means a person who, by the terms of an account, has a present right, subject to request, to payment from the account other than as a beneficiary or agent;

“payment” of sums on deposit includes withdrawal, payment to a party or third person pursuant to check or other request, and a pledge of sums on deposit by a party, or a setoff, reduction, or other disposition of all or part of an account pursuant to a pledge;

“POD designation” means the designation of

a beneficiary in an account payable on request to one party during the party’s lifetime and on the party’s death to one or more beneficiaries, or to one or more parties during their lifetime and on death of all of them to one or more beneficiaries; or

a beneficiary in an account in the name of one or more parties as trustee for one or more beneficiaries if the relationship is established by the terms of the account and there is no subject of the trust other than the sums on deposit in the account, whether or not payment to the beneficiary is mentioned;

“receive,” as it relates to notice to a financial institution, means receipt in the office or branch office of the financial institution in which the account is established, but if the terms of the account require notice at a particular place, in the place required;

“request” means a request for payment complying with all terms of the account, including special requirements concerning necessary signatures and regulations of the financial institution; but, for purposes of AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

, if terms of the account condition payment on advance notice, a request for payment is treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is treated as a request for payment;

“sums on deposit” means the balance payable on an account, including interest and dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance, and deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of death of a party;

“terms of the account” includes the deposit agreement and other terms and conditions, including the form, of the contract of deposit.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.202.
Limitation on scope.

AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

do not apply to

an account established for a partnership, joint venture, or other organization for a business purpose;

an account controlled by one or more persons as an agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, or charitable or civic organization; or

a fiduciary or trust account in which the relationship is established other than by the terms of the account.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.203.
Types of account; existing accounts.

An account may be for a single party or multiple parties. A multiple-party account may be with or without a right of survivorship between the parties. Subject to AS

13.33.212(c)

, either a single-party account or a multiple-party account may have a POD designation, an agency designation, or both.

An account established before, on, or after January 1, 1997, whether in the form prescribed in AS

13.33.204

or in another form, is either a single-party account or a multiple-party account, with or without right of survivorship, and with or without a POD designation or an agency designation, within the meaning of AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

and is governed by AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.204.
Forms.

A contract of deposit that contains provisions in substantially the following form establishes the type of account provided, and the account is governed by the provisions of AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

applicable to an account of that type:

A contract of deposit that does not contain provisions in substantially the form provided in (a) of this section is governed by the provisions of AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

applicable to the type of account that most nearly conforms to the depositor’s intent.

UNIFORM SINGLE - OR MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT FORM PARTIES (Name one or more parties): OWNERSHIP (Select one and initial): SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT
Parties own the account in proportion to net contributions unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. RIGHTS AT DEATH (Select one and initial): SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT
At death of party, ownership passes as part of party’s estate. SINGLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH POD (PAY ON DEATH) DESIGNATION
(Name one or more beneficiaries):
At death of party, ownership passes to POD beneficiaries and is not part of party’s estate. MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP
At death of party, ownership passes to surviving parties. MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP AND POD (PAY ON DEATH) DESIGNATION (Name one or more beneficiaries):
At death of last surviving party, ownership passes to POD beneficiaries and is not part of last surviving party’s estate. MULTIPLE-PARTY ACCOUNT WITHOUT RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP
At death of party, deceased party’s ownership passes as part of deceased party’s estate. AGENCY (POWER OF ATTORNEY) DESIGNATION (Optional)
Agents may make account transactions for parties but do not have ownership or rights at death unless named as POD beneficiaries. (To add agency designation to account, name one or more agents):
(Select one and initial): AGENCY DESIGNATION SURVIVES DISABILITY OR INCAPACITY OF PARTIES AGENCY DESIGNATION TERMINATES ON DISABILITY OR INCAPACITY OF PARTIES.

Click to view

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.205.
Designation of agent and termination of authority.

By writing signed by all parties, the parties may designate as agent of all parties on an account a person other than a party.

Unless the terms of an agency designation provide that the authority of the agent terminates on disability or incapacity of a party, the agent’s authority survives disability and incapacity. The agent may act for a disabled or incapacitated party until the authority of the agent is terminated.

Death of the sole party or last surviving party terminates the authority of an agent.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.206.
Applicability.

The provisions of AS

13.33.211

—

13.33.216

concerning beneficial ownership as between parties or as between parties and beneficiaries apply only to controversies between those persons and their creditors and other successors and do not apply to the right of those persons to payment as determined by the terms of the account. AS

13.33.221

—

13.33.227

govern the liability and setoff rights of financial institutions that make payments under AS

13.33.221

—

13.33.227

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.211.
Ownership during lifetime.

During the lifetime of all parties, an account belongs to the parties in proportion to the net contribution of each to the sums on deposit, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent. As between parties married to each other, in the absence of proof otherwise, the net contribution of each is presumed to be an equal amount.

A beneficiary in an account having a POD designation does not have a right to sums on deposit during the lifetime of any party.

An agent in an account with an agency designation does not have a beneficial right to sums on deposit.

In this section, “net contribution” of a party means the sum of all deposits to an account made by or for the party, less all payments from the account made to or for the party that have not been paid to or applied to the use of another party and a proportionate share of any charges deducted from the account, plus a proportionate share of any interest or dividends earned, whether or not included in the current balance. The term includes deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of death of the party whose net contribution is in question.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.212.
Rights at death.

Except as otherwise provided in AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

, on death of a party, sums on deposit in a multiple-party account belong to the surviving party or parties. If two or more parties survive and one is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent immediately before death was beneficially entitled under AS

13.33.211

belongs to the surviving spouse. If two or more parties survive and none is the surviving spouse of the decedent, the amount to which the decedent immediately before death was beneficially entitled under AS

13.33.211

belongs to the surviving parties in equal shares and augments the proportion to which each survivor immediately before the decedent’s death was beneficially entitled under AS 13.33.211, and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

In an account with a POD designation

on death of one of two or more parties, the rights in sums on deposit are governed by (a) of this section;

on death of the sole party or the last survivor of two or more parties, sums on deposit belong to the surviving beneficiary or beneficiaries; if two or more beneficiaries survive, sums on deposit belong to them in equal and undivided shares, and there is no right of survivorship in the event of death of a beneficiary after coming into ownership; if no beneficiary survives, sums on deposit belong to the estate of the last surviving party.

Sums on deposit in a single-party account without a POD designation, or in a multiple-party account that, by the terms of the account, is without right of survivorship, are not affected by death of a party, but the amount to which the decedent immediately before death was beneficially entitled under AS

13.33.211

is transferred as part of the decedent’s estate. A POD designation in a multiple-party account without right of survivorship is ineffective. For purposes of this section, designation of an account as a tenancy in common establishes that the account is without right of survivorship.

The ownership right of a surviving party or beneficiary, or of the decedent’s estate, in sums on deposit is subject to requests for payment made by a party before the party’s death, whether paid by the financial institution before or after death, or unpaid. The surviving party or beneficiary, or the decedent’s estate, is liable to the payee of an unpaid request for payment. The liability is limited to a proportionate share of the amount transferred under this section to the extent necessary to discharge the request for payment.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.213.
Alteration of rights.

Rights at death under AS

13.33.212

are determined by the terms of the account at the death of a party. The terms of the account may be altered by written notice given by a party to the financial institution to change the terms of the account or to stop or vary payment under the terms of the account. The notice shall be signed by a party and received by the financial institution during the party’s lifetime.

A right of survivorship arising from the express terms of the account, AS

13.33.212

, or a POD designation may not be altered by will.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.214.
Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

Except as provided in AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

or as a consequence of and to the extent directed by AS

13.33.215

, a transfer resulting from the application of AS

13.33.212

is effective by reason of the terms of the account involved and AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

and is not testamentary or subject to AS 13.06 — AS 13.21.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.215.
Rights of creditors and others.

If other assets of the estate are insufficient, a transfer resulting from a right of survivorship or POD designation under AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

is not effective against the estate of a deceased party to the extent needed to pay claims against the estate and statutory allowances to the surviving spouse and children.

A surviving party or beneficiary who receives payment from an account after death of a party is liable to account to the personal representative of the decedent for a proportionate share of the amount received to which the decedent immediately before death was beneficially entitled under AS

13.33.211

, to the extent necessary to discharge the claims and allowances described in (a) of this section remaining unpaid after application of the decedent’s estate. A proceeding to assert the liability may not be commenced unless the personal representative has received a written demand by the surviving spouse, a creditor, a child, or a person acting for a child of the decedent. The proceeding must be commenced within one year after death of the decedent.

A surviving party or beneficiary against whom a proceeding to account is brought may join as a party to the proceeding a surviving party or beneficiary of any other account of the decedent.

Sums recovered by the personal representative shall be administered as part of the decedent’s estate. This section does not affect the protection from claims of the personal representative or estate of a deceased party provided in AS

13.33.226

for a financial institution that makes payment in accordance with the terms of the account.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.216.
Community property and tenancy by the entirety.

A deposit of community property in an account does not alter the community character of the property or community rights in the property, but a right of survivorship between parties married to each other arising from the express terms of the account or AS

13.33.212

may not be altered by will.

AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

do not affect the law governing tenancy by the entirety.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.221.
Authority of financial institution.

A financial institution may enter into a contract of deposit for a multiple-party account to the same extent it may enter into a contract of deposit for a single-party account and may provide for a POD designation and an agency designation in either a single-party account or a multiple-party account. A financial institution need not inquire as to the source of a deposit to an account or as to the proposed application of a payment from an account.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.222.
Payment on multiple-party account.

A financial institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in a multiple-party account to

one or more of the parties whether or not another party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when payment is requested and whether or not the party making the request survives another party; or

the personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as a party or beneficiary, unless the account is without right of survivorship under AS

13.33.212

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.223.
Payment on POD designation.

A financial institution, on request, may pay sums on deposit in an account with a POD designation to

one or more of the parties whether or not another party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when the payment is requested and whether or not a party survives another party;

the beneficiary or beneficiaries if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as parties; or

the personal representative, if any, or, if there is none, the heirs or devisees of a deceased party if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased party was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as a party or beneficiary.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.224.
Payment to designated agent.

A financial institution, on request of an agent under an agency designation for an account, may pay to the agent sums on deposit in the account whether or not a party is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when the request is made or received and whether or not the authority of the agent terminates on the disability or incapacity of a party.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.225.
Payment to minor.

If a financial institution is required or permitted to make payment under AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

to a minor designated as a beneficiary, payment may be made under AS 13.46.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.226.
Discharge.

Payment made under AS

13.33.201

—

13.33.227

in accordance with the terms of the account discharges the financial institution from all claims for amounts so paid, whether or not the payment is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the account as between parties, beneficiaries, or their successors. Payment may be made whether or not a party, beneficiary, or agent is disabled, incapacitated, or deceased when payment is requested, received, or made.

Protection under this section does not extend to payments made after a financial institution has received written notice from a party, or from the personal representative, surviving spouse, or heir or devisee of a deceased party, to the effect that payments in accordance with the terms of the account, including one having an agency designation, should not be permitted, and the financial institution has had a reasonable opportunity to act on it when the payment is made. Unless the notice is withdrawn by the person giving it, the successor of any deceased party must concur in a request for payment if the financial institution is to be protected under this section. Unless a financial institution has been served with process in an action or proceeding, other notice or other information shown to have been available to the financial institution does not affect its right to protection under this section.

A financial institution that receives written notice under this section or otherwise has reason to believe that a dispute exists as to the rights of the parties may refuse, without liability, to make payments in accordance with the terms of the account.

Protection of a financial institution under this section does not affect the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of sums on deposit in accounts or payments made from accounts.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.227.
Setoff.

Without qualifying any other statutory right to setoff or lien and subject to any contractual provision, if a party is indebted to a financial institution, the financial institution has a right to setoff against the account. The amount of the account subject to setoff is the proportion to which the party is, or immediately before death was, beneficially entitled under AS

13.33.211

or, in the absence of proof of that proportion, an equal share with all parties.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)